dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1242 N 1
SFX 1242 0 sindeyiz .

SFX 1243 N 1
SFX 1243 0 sindeyken .

SFX 1244 N 1
SFX 1244 0 yeydi .

SFX 1245 N 1
SFX 1245 0 imde .

SFX 1246 N 1
SFX 1246 0 imizdeki .

SFX 1247 N 1
SFX 1247 0 imsen .

SFX 1248 N 1
SFX 1248 0 indeler .

SFX 1249 N 1
SFX 1249 0 indelermiş .

SFX 1250 N 1
SFX 1250 0 indeymiş .

SFX 1251 N 1
SFX 1251 0 indeyse .

SFX 1252 N 1
SFX 1252 0 ininki .

SFX 1253 N 1
SFX 1253 0 ininse .

SFX 1254 N 1
SFX 1254 0 inizde .

SFX 1255 N 1
SFX 1255 0 inizdeki .

SFX 1256 N 1
SFX 1256 0 inki .

SFX 1257 N 1
SFX 1257 0 lerdenmiş .

SFX 1258 N 1
SFX 1258 0 lerdin .

SFX 1259 N 1
SFX 1259 0 lereydi .

SFX 1260 N 1
SFX 1260 0 lerinizde .

SFX 1261 N 1
SFX 1261 0 leyim .

SFX 1262 N 1
SFX 1262 0 tekilere .

SFX 1263 N 1
SFX 1263 0 tesin .

SFX 1264 N 1
SFX 1264 0 tesiniz .

SFX 1265 N 1
SFX 1265 0 teymiş .

SFX 1266 N 1
SFX 1266 0 teyse .

SFX 1267 N 1
SFX 1267 0 inse .

SFX 1268 N 1
SFX 1268 0 lermiş .

SFX 1269 N 1
SFX 1269 0 mişçesine .

SFX 1270 N 1
SFX 1270 0 tekinden .

SFX 1271 N 1
SFX 1271 0 fa .

SFX 1272 N 1
SFX 1272 0 falarken .

SFX 1273 N 1
SFX 1273 0 iyorsam .

SFX 1274 N 1
SFX 1274 0 yeceğiz .

SFX 1275 N 1
SFX 1275 0 yecektir .

SFX 1276 N 1
SFX 1276 0 zdi .

SFX 1277 N 1
SFX 1277 0 zdik .

SFX 1278 N 1
SFX 1278 0 zdim .

SFX 1279 N 1
SFX 1279 0 zsin .

SFX 1280 N 1
SFX 1280 0 yecekmiş .

SFX 1281 N 1
SFX 1281 0 yeceksin .

SFX 1282 N 1
SFX 1282 0 zim .

SFX 1283 N 1
SFX 1283 0 mişsindir .

SFX 1284 N 1
SFX 1284 0 miştin .

SFX 1285 N 1
SFX 1285 0 mişsen .

SFX 1286 N 1
SFX 1286 0 yeceksiniz .

SFX 1287 N 1
SFX 1287 0 yecekti .

SFX 1288 N 1
SFX 1288 0 yin .

SFX 1289 N 1
SFX 1289 0 zsek .

SFX 1290 N 1
SFX 1290 0 zsen .

SFX 1291 N 1
SFX 1291 0 mişsiniz .

SFX 1292 N 1
SFX 1292 0 mişsinizdir .

SFX 1293 N 1
SFX 1293 0 miştik .

SFX 1294 N 1
SFX 1294 0 mişizdir .

SFX 1295 N 1
SFX 1295 0 ircesine .

SFX 1296 N 1
SFX 1296 0 ydiniz .

SFX 1297 N 1
SFX 1297 0 mişimdir .

SFX 1298 N 1
SFX 1298 0 tiyse .

SFX 1299 N 1
SFX 1299 0 tiysen .

SFX 1300 N 1
SFX 1300 0 fı .

SFX 1301 N 1
SFX 1301 0 fıdır .

SFX 1302 N 1
SFX 1302 0 fım .

SFX 1303 N 1
SFX 1303 0 fımı .

SFX 1304 N 1
SFX 1304 0 fımın .

SFX 1305 N 1
SFX 1305 0 fımız .

SFX 1306 N 1
SFX 1306 0 fımıza .

SFX 1307 N 1
SFX 1307 0 fımızı .

SFX 1308 N 1
SFX 1308 0 fın .

SFX 1309 N 1
SFX 1309 0 fına .

SFX 1310 N 1
SFX 1310 0 fında .

SFX 1311 N 1
SFX 1311 0 fındaki .

SFX 1312 N 1
SFX 1312 0 fından .

SFX 1313 N 1
SFX 1313 0 fındır .

SFX 1314 N 1
SFX 1314 0 fını .

SFX 1315 N 1
SFX 1315 0 fının .

SFX 1316 N 1
SFX 1316 0 fınız .

SFX 1317 N 1
SFX 1317 0 fınıza .

SFX 1318 N 1
SFX 1318 0 fınızı .

SFX 1319 N 1
SFX 1319 0 fınla .

SFX 1320 N 1
SFX 1320 0 fınsa .

SFX 1321 N 1
SFX 1321 0 fıydı .

SFX 1322 N 1
SFX 1322 0 fıyla .

SFX 1323 N 1
SFX 1323 0 'dayım .

SFX 1324 N 1
SFX 1324 0 'lara .

SFX 1325 N 1
SFX 1325 0 ndeki .

SFX 1326 N 1
SFX 1326 0 lerimde .

SFX 1327 N 1
SFX 1327 0 lerindekine .

SFX 1328 N 1
SFX 1328 0 lerininki .

SFX 1329 N 1
SFX 1329 0 lerinizdeki .

SFX 1330 N 1
SFX 1330 0 telerdir .

SFX 1331 N 1
SFX 1331 0 tesinizdir .

SFX 1332 N 1
SFX 1332 0 'dakiyle .

SFX 1333 N 1
SFX 1333 0 'dır .

SFX 1334 N 1
SFX 1334 0 'inin .

SFX 1335 N 1
SFX 1335 0 dakini .

SFX 1336 N 1
SFX 1336 0 daysanız .

SFX 1337 N 1
SFX 1337 0 ydu .

SFX 1338 N 1
SFX 1338 0 'u .

SFX 1339 N 1
SFX 1339 0 umuzun .

SFX 1340 N 1
SFX 1340 0 uysa .

SFX 1341 N 1
SFX 1341 0 'teki .

SFX 1342 N 1
SFX 1342 0 'ten .

SFX 1343 N 1
SFX 1343 0 sunun .

SFX 1344 N 1
SFX 1344 0 imindir .

SFX 1345 N 1
SFX 1345 0 iminki .

SFX 1346 N 1
SFX 1346 0 imizdi .

SFX 1347 N 1
SFX 1347 0 imizmiş .

SFX 1348 N 1
SFX 1348 0 imizsin .

SFX 1349 N 1
SFX 1349 0 imizsiniz .

SFX 1350 N 1
SFX 1350 0 imsin .

SFX 1351 N 1
SFX 1351 0 imsiniz .

SFX 1352 N 1
SFX 1352 0 inim .

SFX 1353 N 1
SFX 1353 0 inizim .

SFX 1354 N 1
SFX 1354 0 insem .

SFX 1355 N 1
SFX 1355 0 iydin .

SFX 1356 N 1
SFX 1356 0 lerdendi .

SFX 1357 N 1
SFX 1357 0 lerimdi .

SFX 1358 N 1
SFX 1358 0 lerinizle .

SFX 1359 N 1
SFX 1359 0 lerinkiyle .

SFX 1360 N 1
SFX 1360 0 lersiniz .

SFX 1361 N 1
SFX 1361 0 leydim .

SFX 1362 N 1
SFX 1362 0 ndakine .

SFX 1363 N 1
SFX 1363 0 ndalar .

SFX 1364 N 1
SFX 1364 0 ndandır .

SFX 1365 N 1
SFX 1365 0 ndaydı .

SFX 1366 N 1
SFX 1366 0 nınkine .

SFX 1367 N 1
SFX 1367 0 nınkini .

SFX 1368 N 1
SFX 1368 0 larımdaki .

SFX 1369 N 1
SFX 1369 0 larındayım .

SFX 1370 N 1
SFX 1370 0 'larınkinden .

SFX 1371 N 1
SFX 1371 0 ınkinden .

SFX 1372 N 1
SFX 1372 0 ardıysa .

SFX 1373 N 1
SFX 1373 0 'ındı .

SFX 1374 N 1
SFX 1374 0 armışsa .

SFX 1375 N 1
SFX 1375 0 armışsın .

SFX 1376 N 1
SFX 1376 0 'sı .

SFX 1377 N 1
SFX 1377 0 'sına .

SFX 1378 N 1
SFX 1378 0 sısınız .

SFX 1379 N 1
SFX 1379 0 daydınız .

SFX 1380 N 1
SFX 1380 0 ndadır .

SFX 1381 N 1
SFX 1381 0 ırlığındaki .

SFX 1382 N 1
SFX 1382 0 ırlıklı .

SFX 1383 N 1
SFX 1383 0 ımızdaki .

SFX 1384 N 1
SFX 1384 0 ındalar .

SFX 1385 N 1
SFX 1385 0 ındasın .

SFX 1386 N 1
SFX 1386 0 ındayken .

SFX 1387 N 1
SFX 1387 0 yımdır .

SFX 1388 N 1
SFX 1388 0 larımdandı .

SFX 1389 N 1
SFX 1389 0 ladırlar .

SFX 1390 N 1
SFX 1390 0 mışsam .

SFX 1391 N 1
SFX 1391 0 ırdın .

SFX 1392 N 1
SFX 1392 0 ırdınız .

SFX 1393 N 1
SFX 1393 0 ıyormuşsunuz .

SFX 1394 N 1
SFX 1394 0 zlarken .

SFX 1395 N 1
SFX 1395 0 larınım .

SFX 1396 N 1
SFX 1396 0 sındır .

SFX 1397 N 1
SFX 1397 0 takilerden .

SFX 1398 N 1
SFX 1398 0 takilerin .

SFX 1399 N 1
SFX 1399 0 nızcadır .

SFX 1400 N 1
SFX 1400 0 ızdır .

SFX 1401 N 1
SFX 1401 0 lardakine .

SFX 1402 N 1
SFX 1402 0 dıydık .

SFX 1403 N 1
SFX 1403 0 dıydım .

SFX 1404 N 1
SFX 1404 0 larındakine .

SFX 1405 N 1
SFX 1405 0 larındalar .

SFX 1406 N 1
SFX 1406 0 larmışım .

SFX 1407 N 1
SFX 1407 0 saymışım .

SFX 1408 N 1
SFX 1408 0 ırlarken .

SFX 1409 N 1
SFX 1409 0 ıyordun .

SFX 1410 N 1
SFX 1410 0 iyordun .

SFX 1411 N 1
SFX 1411 0 seydiniz .

SFX 1412 N 1
SFX 1412 0 yacakmışız .

SFX 1413 N 1
SFX 1413 0 larımızsınız .

SFX 1414 N 1
SFX 1414 0 larıydım .

SFX 1415 N 1
SFX 1415 0 yorken .

SFX 1416 N 1
SFX 1416 0 takinden .

SFX 1417 N 1
SFX 1417 0 takinin .

SFX 1418 N 1
SFX 1418 0 taydık .

SFX 1419 N 1
SFX 1419 0 undaki .

SFX 1420 N 1
SFX 1420 0 undaysa .

SFX 1421 N 1
SFX 1421 0 ninkine .

SFX 1422 N 1
SFX 1422 0 sindenseniz .

SFX 1423 N 1
SFX 1423 0 larımızınkiler .

SFX 1424 N 1
SFX 1424 0 mışlar .

SFX 1425 N 1
SFX 1425 0 mce .

SFX 1426 N 1
SFX 1426 0 tekiler .

SFX 1427 N 1
SFX 1427 0 tekine .

SFX 1428 N 1
SFX 1428 0 ındandır .

SFX 1429 N 1
SFX 1429 0 ınsa .

SFX 1430 N 1
SFX 1430 0 yızdır .

SFX 1431 N 1
SFX 1431 0 ysanız .

SFX 1432 N 1
SFX 1432 0 tandı .

SFX 1433 N 1
SFX 1433 0 tun .

SFX 1434 N 1
SFX 1434 0 nu .

SFX 1435 N 1
SFX 1435 0 suna .

SFX 1436 N 1
SFX 1436 0 suyla .

SFX 1437 N 1
SFX 1437 0 ymuş .

SFX 1438 N 1
SFX 1438 0 ndun .

SFX 1439 N 1
SFX 1439 0 dekilere .

SFX 1440 N 1
SFX 1440 0 dekileri .

SFX 1441 N 1
SFX 1441 0 dekilerin .

SFX 1442 N 1
SFX 1442 0 dekine .

SFX 1443 N 1
SFX 1443 0 dendik .

SFX 1444 N 1
SFX 1444 0 dendirler .

SFX 1445 N 1
SFX 1445 0 denim .

SFX 1446 N 1
SFX 1446 0 deniz .

SFX 1447 N 1
SFX 1447 0 denmiş .

SFX 1448 N 1
SFX 1448 0 denmişiz .

SFX 1449 N 1
SFX 1449 0 denmişler .

SFX 1450 N 1
SFX 1450 0 densin .

SFX 1451 N 1
SFX 1451 0 lerdendik .

SFX 1452 N 1
SFX 1452 0 lerdeniz .

SFX 1453 N 1
SFX 1453 0 lerdense .

SFX 1454 N 1
SFX 1454 0 lerdenseniz .

SFX 1455 N 1
SFX 1455 0 lerdik .

SFX 1456 N 1
SFX 1456 0 lerimizse .

SFX 1457 N 1
SFX 1457 0 lerindekilerin .

SFX 1458 N 1
SFX 1458 0 lerindeniz .

SFX 1459 N 1
SFX 1459 0 lerindir .

SFX 1460 N 1
SFX 1460 0 lerininse .

SFX 1461 N 1
SFX 1461 0 lerinki .

SFX 1462 N 1
SFX 1462 0 lerinkilerdir .

SFX 1463 N 1
SFX 1463 0 lerinse .

SFX 1464 N 1
SFX 1464 0 leriyleyken .

SFX 1465 N 1
SFX 1465 0 mdekiler .

SFX 1466 N 1
SFX 1466 0 mdekilere .

SFX 1467 N 1
SFX 1467 0 mdekilerin .

SFX 1468 N 1
SFX 1468 0 mdekinden .

SFX 1469 N 1
SFX 1469 0 mdeydi .

SFX 1470 N 1
SFX 1470 0 mdeyse .
