dictionaries/tr/index.dic
idrak/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,42,43,253,255,256,261,262,263,267,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,280,281,282,283,288,318,329,331,335,339,373,374,381,649,654,968,969,970,971,976,1184,1185,1186,1188,1189,1245,1248,1250,1852,1854,1855,1879,2587,3003,3269,3273,3285,4117,4276
ilahi/9999,2,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,253,254,255,256,257,258,259,260,283,284,285,311,313,314,315,326,327,328,329,332,333,335,339,348,349,355,359,365,368,373,374,389,419,424,1259,1489
kafes/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,263,264,266,267,279,280,281,283,287,288,318,326,329,331,333,335,339,340,370,381,649,654,967,975,1170,1184,1245,1246,1254,1264,1329,1426,1967,2903,3027
keke/9999,5,6,7,35,257,259,326,383,389,1258,1455,1471,2172,3736,5506
kuzey/9999,1,2,3,4,33,34,35,36,37,252,254,255,256,261,262,263,267,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,282,283,284,319,333,361,539,649,654,655,970,1229,1230,1235,1246,1251,1254,1256,1267,1439,1440,1441,1442,1446,1530,1786,1852,1856,1879,1880,2169,2377,2511,2512,3122,3125
maiyet/34,35,37,38,39,42,254,261,262,263,267,273,274,275,276,277,278,282,283,287,333,335,339,970,1245,1254,1255,1350,1426,1852,1856,1871,1879,1880,2460,3120,3121,3122,3125,5233
meslek/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,288,318,319,326,327,328,329,330,331,332,333,334,335,336,338,339,341,365,366,368,370,371,373,374,382,421,713,980,982,1169,1170,1190,1195,1196,1237,1260,1262,1264,1356,1426,2576,2718,2877,2968,3027,3315,4671
motosiklet/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,261,263,264,266,267,270,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,280,281,282,283,287,288,318,319,327,328,329,332,333,335,339,365,373,374,381,539,654,967,968,970,976,1184,1245,1266,1426,1461,1850,1856,2966
mülkiyet/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,261,262,263,264,267,268,269,270,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,280,282,283,287,288,318,329,333,335,339,340,365,382,539,546,649,654,967,970,1164,1188,1245,1246,1250,1251,1254,1852,1856,1874,1967,2458,2877,4555
oryantalizm/9999,3,33,34,35,38,261,262,267,271,272,274,275,276,277,282,284,319,361,649,1253
otomotiv/9999,2,3,33,34,35,37,38,39,41,105,252,261,272,273,275,276,277,284,335,1229,1231,1256
pençe/9999,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,54,252,254,255,256,257,258,259,260,283,284,313,314,315,316,332,333,335,339,349,359,368,369,371,374,385,390,392,399,494,533,1241,1242,1243,1491,1531,1889,2384,2392,2514,2727
rekabet/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,255,256,261,262,263,267,268,270,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,281,282,283,287,288,318,319,332,333,335,339,340,365,373,381,539,548,649,654,970,975,976,1170,1248,1260,1265,1267
sekiz/9999,2,3,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,105,252,256,261,262,265,267,270,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,282,283,284,335,341,539,548,655,967,969,970,971,1229,1234,1245,1251,1252,1253,1849,1856,3855
seri/9999,2,3,4,6,7,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,253,254,255,256,257,258,259,260,283,313,314,315,328,329,331,332,333,335,339,349,355,359,370,371,374,382,494,504,1231,1242,1260,1326,1356,1460,1492,1494,1495,1506,2381,2394,3327
söylenme/3,5,6,7,8,35,37,38,39,73,105,252,255,256,257,258,259,260,284,312,313,314,315,319,323,325,328,333,335,339,341,344,349,351,355,359,374,407,413,526,598,650,666,667,715,718,720,1162,1165,1168,1244,1269,1275,1276,1281,1287,1288,1491,2682
şekillendirileme/73,341,598,1276
terlikçi/9999,3,5,35,36,38,39,257,335,1257
tespih/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,256,261,263,266,267,268,272,274,275,276,277,282,287,288,328,335,368,373,374,382,968,1260
titizlenebil/1273
üteme/1279
verilmek/34,42,43,288,340,712,980,1164,1170,1265,1266,1967
verilmemek/34,42,288,340,1164,1265,1967
vitrin/35,36,37,38,39,41,252,253,254,255,256,266,267,269,270,273,274,275,276,277,278,280,282,283,327,329,333,335,339,364,365,370,373,374,494,649,654,967,970,975,1182,1184,1185,1188,1189,1237,1238,1245,1246,1248,1251,1254,1255,1260,1669,1850,1852,2272,3126
yükseklik/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,288,318,319,333,335,339,340,1164,1169,1170,1263,1265,1892,1967,2878,2966
zerrin/2,3,33,34,35,37,41,256,261,267,272,1261
